Tennessee, session 114, HB0583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-7-123(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) The child or the forensic interviewer who conducted the interview testifies,
under oath, that the offered video recording is a true and correct recording of the events
contained in the video recording and the child is available for cross examination;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-7-123(b)(3)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(i) Was employed by a child advocacy center that meets the requirements of § 9-
4-213(a) or (b); provided, however, that an interview shall not be inadmissible solely
because the interviewer is employed by a child advocacy center that:
(a) Is not a nonprofit corporation, if the child advocacy center is
accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency; or
(b) Employs an executive director who does not meet the criteria of § 9-
4-213(a)(2), if the executive director is supervised by a publicly elected official; or
(ii) Was employed by a federal agency and conducted the forensic interview in
the course of an investigation of a federal crime;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0583
002234
- 1 -